Massachusetts, session 194th, S1861.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. For the purposes of this section, an “independent retirement system” shall
mean any Massachusetts public pension system under the oversight, monitoring, and regulation
of the public employee retirement administration commission; and a “fossil fuel company” shall
mean a company identified by a Global Industry Classification Standard code in one of the
following sectors: (1) coal and consumable fuels; (2) integrated oil and gas; or (3) oil and gas
exploration and production.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any independent retirement
system may, in accordance with the procurement process under section 23B of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, divest in whole or in part from any investment in fossil fuel companies. In
accordance with this section, the board of an independent retirement system may, after following
of 2

the procurement process under said section 23B of said chapter 32, invest in index funds or other
investment vehicles that may not include fossil fuel companies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2